trunk/morphology/normalizer/normalizer.xfst
# set char-encoding utf-8
# -*- encoding: utf-8 -*-
# TODOs: 
# -nti-n -> other than 3rd person: kinsantinkun, kinsantiykichis, kinsantiyku
# done:
# -switches: allow -m as -n, -pas as -pis
# yachachinasuykikupaq yacha[VRoot][=saber,habitar][^DB][--]chi[VDeriv][+Caus][^DB][--]na[NS][+Obl][^DB][--]suykiku[NPers][+1.Pl.Excl.Subj_2.Sg.Obj]
# -upallarapuyku LLAra
# compile without -sa progressive! too ambiguous
# -rqakun -> rqaku -n / -rqa -ku -n

       #derivation boundary
       define DB [[ "[" "^DB" "]"] :0];

      #Morpheme-Boundary
       define MB [[ "[""--""]"] :0];

       #-------------------------------#
       # Delete all flag on both sides #
       #-------------------------------#
       define Cleanup1 [["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@RI"|"@MPA"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|%["CARD"%]|"+nn"|"@PLYUQ"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@PLbol"|"@HUM"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@EXCEPT"|"@Misspelled"|"@ROOTn"] -> ""];
       define Cleanup2 ["" <- ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@KU"|"@YSI"|"@MPA"|"@RI"|"@CHI"|"@RQU"|"@MI"|"@SI"|"@SIS"|"@CHA"|"@Vdim"|"@YKU"|"@YU"|"@PTI"|"@STI"|"@PA"|"@GENq"|"@TA"|"@AS"|"@ALLI"|"@HATU"|"@POSS"|"@POSSni"|"+ku+"|"+yku+"|"+yu+"|"+rqu+"|"+ru+"|"+pu+"|"+mu+"|"+nn"|"@NAWPA"|"@CHIQA"|"@YANA"|"@WA"|"@INTR"|"@INTRsu"|"@SU"|"@TRAN"|"@1OBJ"|"+y+"|"@SAPROG"|"@IMP"|"@PLYUQ"|"@ILLA"|"@YURA"|"@CHANI"|"@UKU"|"@WISKA"|"@PLbol"|"@HUM"|"@PORTMANTEAU"|"@EXCEPT"|"@Misspelled"|"@ROOTn"] ];

############################################################################### 

          #########################
          #                       #
          # PHONETIC VARIATIONS   #
          #                       #
          #########################

      define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u|á|é|í|ó|ú|A|E|I|O|U|Á|É|Í|Ó|Ú|"@TA"|{pa}"@PA"|"@PTI"|"@STI"];
      define Cons [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|ñ|p|q|r|s|t|v|w|y|z|'|{m}"@MU"|{m}"@MI"|{s}"@SI"|{ch}"@CHA"|{ntin}"@NTIN"|{p}"@PA"|{q}"@PA"];

      #--------------------------#
      # allow uppercase letters  #
      #--------------------------#

      define LowerCase [A (->) a, B (->) b, C (->) c,D (->) d,E (->) e,F (->) f,G (->) g,H (->) h,I (->) i,J (->) j,K (->) k,L (->) l,M (->) m,N (->) n,O (->) o,P (->) p,Q (->) q,R (->) r,S (->) s,T (->) t,U (->) u,V (->) v,W (->) w,X (->) x,Y (->) y,Z (->) z,Ñ (->) ñ, Á (->) á, É (->) é, Í (->) í, Ó (->) ó, Ú (->) ú ];

      define UpperCase [ a (->) A,b (->) B,c (->) C,d (->) D,e (->) E,f (->) F,g (->) G,h (->) H,i (->) I,j (->) J,k (->) K,l (->) L,m (->) M,n (->) N,o (->) O,p (->) P,q (->) Q,r (->) R,s (->) S,t (->) T,u (->) U,v (->) V,w (->) W,x (->) X,y (->) Y,z (->) Z,ñ (->) Ñ, á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú ];


      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # Ersetze optional u durch o und i durch e, falls in Umgebung von q #
      #-------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define Allophone1 [ u (->) o||  _ (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}) q, q (s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}) _  , _ (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|h|l|'|{ll}) _ ] .o. [i (->) e || _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|{ll}) q, q (s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|h|') _ , _ (s|t|n|r|h|l|{ll}){cc}, {cc}(s|t|n|r|l|{ll}|') _  ];
      define Allophone2 [ {ll} (->) l || _ q];

      define Apo [' (->) ’] ;
      define Allophone [Allophone1 .o. Allophone2 ] ;
      
      define AllophoneBeforeCleanUp [ m (->) n || \"@MPA" _ p ];

       define QuechuaOrtho Allophone;

       # apply after Cleanup
       define Accent1 [ a (->) á, u (->) ú ||  _ [w|y] .#.];
       define Accent2 [ {qa} (->) {qá}, {taq} (->) {táq}, {ri} (->) {rí}|| _  .#.];
       define Accent Accent1 .o. Accent2;
       
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       # Orthography of Spanish loan words:              #
       #                                                 #
       #- may be written with or without their accents   #
       #- e may be written as i, o as u in Spanish words #
       #-------------------------------------------------#
       define AccentES [ á (->) a,é (->) [e|i],í (->) i, ó (->) [o|u],ú (->) u, ü (->) u, Á (->) A, É (->) E, Í (->) I, Ó (->) O, Ú (->) U];
       define AccentES2 [ a (->) á,e (->) é, i (->) í,o (->) ó, u (->) ú, u (->) ü ];
       define spanLetras [ e (->) i, i (->) e, o (->) u, u (->) o, c (->) k , d (->) t, g (->)j, w  (->) o, b (->) p, v (->) w, z (->) s , j (->) h];
       define SpanOrtho AccentES .o. AccentES2 .o. spanLetras;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               MORPHOPHONOLOGICAL RULES                             ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################

      ###########
      # NOMINAL #
      ###########

      #-----------------------------------------------------#
      # Possessive -nkuna -> ambiguous: -n-kuna or nku-kuna #
      #-----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 3PossPl  [ {nku} %["NPers"%] %["+3.Pl.Poss"%] (<-) n %["NPers"%] %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 3PossPl  [  %["+3.Poss"%] <-  %["+3.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       #----------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive -ykuna -> ambiguous: y-kuna or yku-kuna #
       #----------------------------------------------------#

      # define 1PossPl [ {yku} %["NPers"%] %["+1.Pl.Excl.Poss"%] (<-) y %["NPers"%] %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];
       define 1PossPl [  %["+1.Poss"%] <-  %["+1.Sg.Poss"%] \\  _ %["--"%]{kuna}%["Num"%] ];

       define PossessivPlural [3PossPl .o. 1PossPl];

       #------------------------------------------------------------#
       # Genitive -pa after Konsonant, -q/-p after Vowel (optional) #
       #------------------------------------------------------------#
      # define GENITIV [ {pa}"@PA" (->) [{p}|{q}]"@PA"  ||Vowel  _ ];
	define PA1 [  {q}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define PA2 [  {p}"@PA"  => Vowel _  ];
	#define PA3 [  {pa}"@PA" => Cons _  ];
      define GENITIV PA1 .o. PA2 ;

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # Possessive forms need euphon. -ni/-ñi after Consonants #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#

        #define POSSESSIV1 [ {@POSS} -> [{ni}|{ñi}]  || Cons _ ];
        #define POSSESSIV2 [ {@POSS} ->  "" || Vowel _ ];
	#define POSSESSIV POSSESSIV1 .o. POSSESSIV2;

	define POSS1 [ "@POSS"  => Vowel _  ];
	define POSS2 [ "@POSSni" => Cons _  ];
	
	# misspelled -yki after -i: wasiki -> recognized as wasiyki
	define POSS3 [ "@Misspelled" => [{i}|"@PTI"] _  ];

       define POSSESSIV POSS1 .o. POSS2 .o. POSS3;

       define NounRules GENITIV .o. POSSESSIV;
       
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # restrict plural -s to a position before case suffixes, otherwise assume it's the indirect evidential #
       #------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define BolPl [  "@PLbol"  =>  _ ?* "Cas" ];
      
      define NounRulesUpper BolPl;

       ##########
       # VERBAL #
       ##########

       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # CONTEXT RESTRICTIONS:                                  #
       # na as +Rzpr has be followed by ku, chi or spa          #
       # mu shortened to 'n' is only allowed preceding pu       #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define naRzpr [  "+Rzpr"  => _ ?* ["+Rflx_Int"|"+Caus"|"+SS"] ];
       define shortYKU [  "+y+"  => _ %["VDeriv"%] %["+Aff"%] "@YKU" %["^DB"%] %["--"%]{wa}%["VPers"%] ];

       # transitive forms
       define watrans [  "@WA"  => "+1.Obj" ?* _  ];
       define sutrans [  "@SU"  => "+2.Obj" ?* _  ];
       
       # sometimes inverted sequence (with "@PORTMANTEAU" ): 
       # sqa-sunki, rqa-sunki instead of su-rqa-nki -> limit these forms to after +Prog, +NPst, +Ipst
       define portmanteau [  "@PORTMANTEAU"  => ["+IPst"|"+Prog"|"+NPst"] %] %[ "^DB" %] _  ];
       
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # if in lower side {rqu} as {rqa}, {pu} as {pa} etc. -> we want those forms to appear on the upper side as well               #
       # (otherwise rqa/pa would appear as rqu/pu in the output, which would be wrong given the morphological context of these forms #
       # for normalizer: rewrite ru as rqu and ra as rqa, respectivly, same with  yu/yku, ya/yka                                     #
       # NOTE: sequence -rqa-ku will be normalized to -rqu-ku !                                                                      #
       #-----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

       define rqurqa5 [ {rqa}"+rqu+" <- {rqu}"+rqu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa6 [ {rqu}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa7 [ {rqa}"+ru+" <- {ru}"+ru+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       
      # define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
      # define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
      # define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"@Vdim"|"+Rzpr"]];
       
       # without Vdim -> else ambiguous with -ykacha
       define ykuyka3 [ {yka}"+yku+" <- {yku}"+yku+" \\ _   ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka4 [ {yku}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ~$["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];
       define ykuyka5 [ {yka}"+yu+" <- {yu}"+yu+" \\ _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"|"+Rzpr"]];

       define mpuDIR2 [ {m}"+mu+" <- {mu}"+mu+"  \\  _ ?* "@PU" ];

       define pupa2 [ {pa}"+pu+" <- {pu}"+pu+" \\  _  ?* ["@KU"|"@MU"] ];
       define kuka2 [ {ka}"+ku+" <- {ku}"+ku+" \\  _  ?* ["@MU"|"@CHI"|"@PU"|"+Rzpr"] ];

      define VerbRulesUpper  naRzpr .o. shortYKU .o. rqurqa5 .o. rqurqa6 .o. rqurqa7 .o. ykuyka3 .o. ykuyka4 .o. ykuyka5 .o. mpuDIR2  .o. pupa2 .o. kuka2 .o. watrans .o. sutrans .o. portmanteau;

       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       # rqu --> rqa before mu, pu , ri ,ysi (rqa can only be +Rptn in this position, everywhere   #
       # else, it's supposed to be NPst                                                            #
       #-------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
       define rqurqa1 [ {rqu}"@RQU"-> {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa2 [ {ru}"@RQU"-> {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* ["@MU"|"@PU"|"@YSI"|"@CHI"|"@RI"]];
       define rqurqa3 [ {rqu}"@RQU" (->) {rqa}"@RQU"  || _  ?* "@KU"];
       define rqurqa4 [ {ru}"@RQU" (->) {ra}"@RQU" || _ ?* "@KU"];      
